District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.82

Full faith and credit of the District.

The full faith and credit of the District is pledged for the payment of the principal of and interest on any general obligation bond or note issued under § 1-204.61(a), § 1-204.71(a), or § 1-204.72(a), whether or not such pledge is stated in such bond or note or in the act authorizing the issuance of such bond or note.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 807, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 482
as added Dec. 23, 1981, 95 Stat. 1498, Pub. L. 97-105, § 14

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-340.31.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-331.1.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority under D.C. Act 8-246, the “Tax Revenue Anticipation Notes Act of 1990.”, see Mayor’s Order 90-118, September 27, 1990.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 9-46, the “General Fund Recovery Act of 1991.”, see Mayor’s Order 91-147, October 4, 1991.